Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1613YC (1) 91 sc/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 70A.42 Cancer screening. 1 1. Beginning July 1, 2025, and for each plan year 2 thereafter, a public employer shall provide as occupational 3 coverage to a fire fighter, police officer, or emergency 4 medical services provider, who is employed as a full-time 5 paid employee and enrolled in the employerâs health insurance 6 program, health care benefits that include a cancer screening 7 examination conducted by a physician not more than three years 8 after the start of the personâs employment as a fire fighter, 9 police officer, or emergency medical services provider and 10 every three years thereafter during the course of the personâs 11 employment. 12 2. A political subdivision of the state shall be eligible 13 for reimbursement from the state for the cost of providing 14 the benefits required by subsection 1. However, the amount 15 reimbursed to the political subdivision for a cancer screening 16 examination shall not exceed one thousand two hundred fifty 17 dollars per three-year period per eligible employee. A 18 political subdivision shall maintain adequate records to 19 facilitate the reimbursement. 20 3. A fire fighter, police officer, or emergency medical 21 services provider employed as a full-time paid employee of 22 a public employer shall not be required to pay a copayment, 23 deductible, coinsurance, or out-of-pocket expense for an 24 examination under this section. 25 4. For purposes of this section, âpublic employerâ means 26 the state or a political subdivision of the state that employs 27 a fire fighter, police officer, or emergency medical services 28 provider. 29 Sec. 2. Section 97A.1, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended 30 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 31 following: 32 6. âCancerâ means a group of diseases involving abnormal 33 cell growth with the potential to invade or spread to other 34 parts of the body. 35 -1- LSB 1613YC (1) 91 sc/ns 1/ 3 H.F. _____ Sec. 3. Section 411.1, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended 1 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 2 following: 3 6. âCancerâ means a group of diseases involving abnormal 4 cell growth with the potential to invade or spread to other 5 parts of the body. 6 Sec. 4. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT ââ CANCER SCREENING 7 APPROPRIATION. There is appropriated from the general fund of 8 the state to the department of management for the fiscal year 9 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 10 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 11 purposes designated: 12 To reimburse political subdivisions of the state for the 13 costs of cancer screening examinations pursuant to section 14 70A.42, as enacted by this Act: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 16 Sec. 5. IMPLEMENTATION OF ACT. Section 25B.2, subsection 17 3, shall not apply to this Act. 18